District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.21

Termination and suspension.

(a)

A membership in a membership corporation may be terminated or suspended for the reasons and in the manner provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(b)

A proceeding challenging a termination or suspension for any reason shall be commenced within one year after the effective date of the termination or suspension.

(c)

The termination or suspension of a member shall not relieve the member from any obligations incurred or commitments made prior to the termination or suspension.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-408.22.